Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.100

Bribe receiving by a witness.

(1) A witness or a person who has reason to believe he or she is about to be called as a witness in any official proceeding or that he or she may have information relevant to a criminal investigation or the abuse or neglect of a minor child is guilty of bribe receiving by a witness if he or she requests, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit pursuant to an agreement or understanding that:

(a) The person's testimony will thereby be influenced; or

(b) The person will attempt to avoid legal process summoning him or her to testify; or

(c) The person will attempt to absent himself or herself from an official proceeding to which he or she has been legally summoned; or

(d) The person will not report information he or she has relevant to a criminal investigation or the abuse or neglect of a minor child.

(2) Bribe receiving by a witness is a class B felony.

[ 1994 c 271 s 203; 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 17; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.100.]

NOTES:

Finding—1994 c 271: See note following RCW 9A.72.090.

Purpose—Severability—1994 c 271: See notes following RCW 9A.28.020.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.